District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.04

Meetings.

(a)

The Ethics Board shall hold regular monthly meetings in accordance with a schedule to be established by the Ethics Board. Additional meetings may be called as needed by the Ethics Board.

(b)

The Ethics Board shall provide notice of meetings and shall conduct its meetings in compliance with subchapter IV of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 204, 59 DCR 1862